Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Subarticle C. Absentee Voter Law.

§ 23-15-711.
Short title.

The title of Sections 23-15-711 through 23-15-721 shall be the Mississippi Absentee Voter Law.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-9-601 [Codes, 1942, § 3203-301; Laws, 1972, ch. 490, § 301; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 343]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 229, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-713.
Electors qualified to vote as absentees.

For the purpose of this subarticle, any duly qualified elector may vote as provided in this subarticle if he be one who falls within the following categories:

Any qualified elector who is a bona fide student, teacher or administrator at any college, university, junior college, high, junior high, or elementary grade school whose studies or employment at such institution necessitates his absence from the county of his voting residence on the date of any primary, general or special election, or the spouse and dependents of said student, teacher or administrator if such spouse or dependent(s) maintain a common domicile, outside of the county of his voting residence, with such student, teacher or administrator.

Any qualified elector who is required to be away from his place of residence on any election day due to his employment as an employee of a member of the Mississippi congressional delegation and the spouse and dependents of such person if he or she shall be residing with such absentee voter away from the county of the spouse’s voting residence.

Any qualified elector who is away from his county of residence on election day for any reason.

Any person who has a temporary or permanent physical disability and who, because of such disability, is unable to vote in person without substantial hardship to himself or others, or whose attendance at the voting place could reasonably cause danger to himself or others.

The parent, spouse or dependent of a person with a temporary or permanent physical disability who is hospitalized outside of his county of residence or more than fifty (50) miles distant from his residence, if the parent, spouse or dependent will be with such person on election day.

Any person who is sixty-five (65) years of age or older.

Any member of the Mississippi congressional delegation absent from Mississippi on election day, and the spouse and dependents of such member of the congressional delegation.

Any qualified elector who will be unable to vote in person because he is required to be at work on election day during the times at which the polls will be open.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-9-603 [Codes, 1942, § 3203-302; Laws, 1972, ch. 490, § 302; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 343]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 230; Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 230; Laws, 1993, ch. 528, § 7, eff from and after August 16, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the amendment of this section).

§ 23-15-715.
Applications for absentee ballots.

Any elector desiring an absentee ballot as provided in this subarticle may secure same if:

Not more than forty-five (45) days nor later than 12:00 noon on the Saturday immediately preceding elections held on Tuesday, the Thursday immediately preceding elections held on Saturday, or the second day immediately preceding the date of elections held on other days, he shall appear in person before the registrar of the county in which he resides, or for municipal elections he shall appear in person before the city clerk of the municipality in which he resides and, when the elector so appears, he shall execute and file an application as provided in Section 23-15-627 and vote by absentee ballot, except that if the ballot has not been printed by forty-five (45) days preceding the election, the elector may appear and file an application anytime before the election. Then the absentee ballot shall be mailed by the circuit clerk to the elector as soon as the ballot has been printed.

Within forty-five (45) days next prior to any election, any elector who cannot comply with paragraph (a) of this section by reason of temporarily residing outside the county, or any person who has a temporary or permanent physical disability, persons who are sixty-five (65) years of age or older, or any person who is the parent, spouse or dependent of a temporarily or permanently physically disabled person who is hospitalized outside of his county of residence or more than fifty (50) miles away from his residence and such parent, spouse or dependent will be with such person on election day, may make application for an absentee ballot by mailing the appropriate application to the registrar. Only persons temporarily residing out of the county of their residence, persons having a temporary or permanent physical disability, persons who are sixty-five (65) years of age or older, or any person who is the parent, spouse or dependent of a temporarily or permanently physically disabled person who is hospitalized outside of his county of residence or more than fifty (50) miles away from his residence, and such parent, spouse or dependent will be with such person on election day, may obtain absentee ballots by mail under the provisions of this subsection and as provided by Section 23-15-713. Applications of persons temporarily residing outside the county shall be sworn to and subscribed before an official who is authorized to administer oaths or other official authorized to witness absentee balloting as provided in this chapter, said application to be accompanied by such verifying affidavits as required by this chapter. The applications of persons having a temporary or permanent physical disability shall not be required to be accompanied by an affidavit but shall be witnessed and signed by a person eighteen (18) years of age or older. The registrar shall send to such absent voter a proper absentee voter ballot within twenty-four (24) hours, or as soon thereafter as the ballots are available, containing the names of all candidates who qualify or the proposition to be voted on in such election, and with such ballot there shall be sent an official envelope containing upon it in printed form the recitals and data hereinafter required.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-9-605 [Codes, 1942, § 3203-303; Laws, 1972, ch. 490, § 303; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 343]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 231; Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 231; Laws, 1993, ch. 528, § 8, eff from and after August 16, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the amendment of this section).

§ 23-15-717.
Completion of application forms.

Any elector enumerated in Section 23-15-713 applying for an absentee ballot shall complete an application form as provided in Section 23-15-627, and said elector shall fill in the application as is appropriate for his particular situation.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-9-607 [Codes, 1942, § 3203-304; Laws, 1972, ch. 490, § 304; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 343]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 232, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-719.
Delivery of ballots to applicant; completion of ballots; affidavit; delivery of ballots to registrar.

Immediately upon completion of an application filed pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (a) of Section 23-15-715, the registrar shall deliver the necessary ballots to the applicant. The registrar shall identify the applicant by requiring him to present identification as required by Section 23-15-563, and shall then deliver the ballots to the applicant by mail or to the applicant in the registrar’s office. The registrar shall not personally hand deliver ballots to voters, unless he delivers the ballots in the office of the registrar. The elector shall fill in his ballot in secret. After the applicant has properly marked the ballot and properly folded it, he shall deposit it in the envelope furnished him by the registrar.

After he has sealed the envelope, he shall subscribe and swear to an affidavit in the following form, which shall be printed on the back of the envelope containing the applicant’s ballot:

Click to view

After the completion of the requirements of this section, the elector shall deliver the envelope containing the ballot to the registrar.

If the voter has received assistance in marking his ballot, the person providing the assistance shall complete the following form which shall be printed on the back of the envelope containing the applicant’s ballot:

Click to view

The envelope used pursuant to this section shall not contain the form prescribed by Section 23-15-635 and shall have printed on the flap on the back of the envelope in bold print and in a distinguishing color, the following: “YOUR VOTE WILL BE REJECTED AND NOT COUNTED IF THIS ENVELOPE IS NOT SIGNED ACROSS THE FLAP OF THIS ENVELOPE BY YOU AND AN ATTESTING WITNESS.”

“STATE OF MISSISSIPPI COUNTY OF I, , do solemnly swear that this envelope contains the ballot marked by me indicating my choice of the candidates or propositions to be submitted at the election to be held on the day of , 2, and I hereby authorize the registrar to place this envelope in the ballot box on my behalf, and I further authorize the election managers to open this envelope and place my ballot among the other ballots cast before such ballots are counted, and record my name on the poll list as if I were present in person and voted. I further swear that I marked the enclosed ballot in secret. (Signature of voter)
SWORN TO AND SUBSCRIBED before me, , this the day of, 2. (Registrar) (Registrar)”

“CERTIFICATE OF PERSON PROVIDING VOTER ASSISTANCE (To be completed only if the voter has received assistance in marking the enclosed ballot.) I hereby certify that the above-named voter declared to me that he or she is blind, temporarily or permanently physically disabled, or cannot read or write, and that the voter requested that I assist the voter in marking the enclosed absentee ballot. I hereby certify that the ballot preferences on the enclosed ballot are those communicated by the voter to me, and that I have marked the enclosed ballot in accordance with the voter’s instructions. Signature of person providing assistance Printed name of person providing assistance Address of person providing assistance Date and time assistance provided Family relationship to voter (if any)”

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-9-611 [Codes, 1942, § 3203-306; Laws, 1972, ch. 490, § 306; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 343]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 233; Laws, 1999, ch. 420, § 5; Laws, 2008, ch. 528, § 13; Laws, 2012, ch. 526, § 8, eff August 5, 2013 (the date of the United States Attorney General’s response to the submission of this section under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965).

§ 23-15-721.
Procedures applicable to electors temporarily residing outside county and to electors who are physically disabled; mailing of ballots to registrar.

Electors temporarily residing outside the county and obtaining an absentee ballot under the provisions of paragraph (b) of Section 23-15-715 shall appear before any official authorized to administer oaths or other official authorized to witness absentee balloting as provided in this chapter. The elector shall exhibit to such official his absentee ballot unmarked and thereupon proceed in secret to fill in his ballot. After the elector has properly marked the ballot and properly folded it, he shall deposit it in the envelope furnished him. After he has sealed the envelope he shall deliver it to the official before whom he is appearing and shall subscribe and swear to the elector’s certificate provided for in Section 23-15-635, which affidavit shall be printed on the back of the envelope as provided for in Section 23-15-635.

Electors who are temporarily or permanently physically disabled shall sign the elector’s certificate and the certificate of attesting witness shall be signed by any person eighteen (18) years of age or older.

After the completion of the requirements of this section, the elector shall mail the envelope containing the ballot to the registrar in the county wherein said elector is qualified to vote. Except as otherwise provided by Section 23-15-699 and excluding presidential ballots as provided for in Sections 23-15-731 and 23-15-733, the ballots must be received by the registrar prior to 5:00 p.m. on the day preceding the election to be counted.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-9-613 [Codes, 1942, § 3203-307; Laws, 1972, ch. 490, § 307; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 343]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 234; Laws, 2012, ch. 465, § 5, eff September 17, 2012 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).